test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ruavast_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - ruávást: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    ruávást+N+Sg+Nom: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Gen: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Acc: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Ill: ruávástân        # ruáˊvástân
    ruávást+N+Sg+Loc: ruávástist       # ruáˊvástist 
    ruávást+N+Sg+Com: ruávástáin       # ruáˊvástáin
    ruávást+N+Sg+Abe: ruávásttáá       #
    ruávást+N+Ess: ruávástin           # ruáˊvástin
    ruávást+N+Par: ruávástid           # ruáˊvástid 
    ruávást+N+Pl+Nom: ruávásteh        # ruáˊvásteh
    ruávást+N+Pl+Gen: ruávástij        # ruáˊvástij
    ruávást+N+Pl+Acc: ruávástijd       # ruáˊvástijd
    ruávást+N+Pl+Ill: ruávástáid       # ruáˊvástáid
    ruávást+N+Pl+Loc: ruávástijn       # ruáˊvástijn
    ruávást+N+Pl+Com: ruávástijguin    # ruáˊvástijguin
    ruávást+N+Pl+Abe: ruávástijttáá    # ruáˊvástijttáá
